Illinois, session 104th, HB3783.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-1404 and by adding Section 11-1404.5 as 6follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/11-1404)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-1404)8    Sec. 11-1404. Special equipment for persons riding 9motorcycles, motor driven cycles or mopeds.10    (a) The operator of a motorcycle, motor driven cycle or 11moped and every passenger thereon shall be protected by a 12safety helmet and glasses, goggles or a transparent shield.13    (b) For the purposes of this Section, glasses, goggles, 14and transparent shields are defined as follows:15    "Glasses" means ordinary eye pieces such as spectacles or 16sunglasses worn before the eye, made of shatter-resistant 17material. "Shatter-resistant material", as used in this 18Section, means material so manufactured, fabricated, or 19created that it substantially prevents shattering or flying 20when struck or broken.21    "Goggles" means a device worn before the eyes, the 22predominant function of which is protecting the eyes without 23obstructing peripheral vision. Goggles shall provide   HB3783- 2 -LRB104 10502 LNS 20577 b1protection from the front and sides, and may or may not form a 2complete seal with the face.3    "Safety helmet" means a protective covering for the head 4consisting of a hard outer shell, padding adjacent to and 5inside the outer shell, and a chin-strap type retention system 6with a sticker indicating that the safety helmet meets 7standards established by the United States Department of 8Transportation. 9    "Transparent shield" means a windshield attached to the 10front of a motorcycle that extends above the eyes when an 11operator is seated in the normal, upright riding position, 12made of shatter-resistant material, or a shatter-resistant 13protective face shield that covers the wearer's eyes and face 14at least to a point approximately to the tip of the nose.15    (c) Contact lenses are not acceptable eye protection 16devices.17(Source: P.A. 96-554, eff. 1-1-10.) 18    (625 ILCS 5/11-1404.5 new)19    Sec. 11-1404.5. Unlawful use of a motorcycle, motor driven 20cycle, or moped without a safety helmet. 21    (a) For the purposes of this Section, "wear a safety 22helmet" or "wearing a safety helmet" means having a safety 23helmet meeting the requirements of Section 11-1404 on the 24person's head that is fastened with the helmet straps and that 25is of a size that fits the wearing person's head securely   HB3783- 3 -LRB104 10502 LNS 20577 b1without excessive lateral or vertical movement.2    (b) It is unlawful to operate a motorcycle, motor driven 3cycle, or moped if the driver or any passenger is not wearing a 4safety helmet as required by Section 11-1404.5    (c) It is unlawful to ride as a passenger on a motorcycle, 6motor driven cycles, or moped if the driver or any passenger is 7not wearing a safety helmet as required by Section 11-1404.8    (d) This Section applies to a person who is riding on a 9motorcycle, motor driven cycle, or moped operated on State 10highways.11    (e) This Section does not apply to a person operating, or 12riding as a passenger in, a fully enclosed 3-wheeled motor 13vehicle that is not less than 7 feet in length and not less 14than 4 feet in width, and has an unladen weight of 900 pounds 15or more, if the vehicle meets or exceeds all of the 16requirements of this Code, the federal Motor Vehicle Safety 17Standards, and the rules and regulations adopted by the United 18States Department of Transportation and the National Highway 19Traffic Safety Administration.20    (f) This Section does not apply to a driver or passenger 21who wears a turban or patka as an expression of the person's 22religious belief and practice when riding on a motorcycle, 23motor driven cycle, or moped.24    (g) In enacting this Section, it is the intent of the 25General Assembly to ensure that all persons are provided with 26an additional safety benefit while operating or riding a   HB3783- 4 -LRB104 10502 LNS 20577 b1motorcycle, motor driven cycle, or moped.